apertium-ckb.ckb.lexd
پیاو:پیاو       # man
سەگ:سەگ         # dog
رۆژ:رۆژ         # day
نامە:نامە       # letter
دەرگا:دەرگا     # door
لاپەڕە:لاپەڕە     # page
نان:نان         # bread
ئاو:ئاو           # water
خودا:خودا       # god
زەوی:زەوی       # earth
فیلم:فیلم       # film
ناو:ناو         # name
ئاژەڵ:ئاژەڵ     # animal
زمان:زمان       # language / tongue
ژمارە:ژمارە     # amount / number
وتار:وتار       # speech
وشە:وشە         # word
ساڵ:ساڵ         # year
شار:شار         # city
ئەنجومەن:ئەنجومەن        # committee
سەر:سەر             # head
بڕیارنامە:بڕیارنامە       # document
دانیشتوو:دانیشتوو        # resident
خەڵک:خەڵک            # people
دایک:دایک
بیر:بیر
تەمەن:تەمەن
ئاوێتە:ئاوێتە
سێگۆشە:سێگۆشە
فلیمساز:فلیمساز
تیپ:تیپ
گەمە:گەمە
سەرۆکایەتی:سەرۆکایەتی
ئوسترالی:ئوسترالی
خێزان:خێزان
بنەماڵە:بنەماڵە
گرێ
مەسرەف:مەسرەف
کەمپەین:کەمپەین
ڕاکردوو:ڕاکردوو
ووشتر:ووشتر
گەشەسەندن:گەشەسەندن
تەلەفون:تەلەفون
شێتبوون:شێتبوون
كلۆر:كلۆر
نیوەھێڵ:نیوەھێڵ
بایەخدار:بایەخدار
سوێند:سوێند
وێژە:وێژە
ئمپڕاتوور:ئمپڕاتوور
دەمارناس:دەمارناس
کەمدوو:کەمدوو
ستور:ستور
تونێل:تونێل
پسپۆڕ:پسپۆڕ
پێشەنگ:پێشەنگ
توێژینەوە:توێژینەوە
مۆزەخانە:مۆزەخانە
تەماتە:تەماتە
یەهوودی:یەهوودی
لێکدانەوە:لێکدانەوە
ئەلیکترۆن:ئەلیکترۆن
پۆلیس:پۆلیس
جۆگە:جۆگە
ئاین:ئاین
دووانە:دووانە
جاف:جاف
جلوبەرگ:جلوبەرگ
گۆشت:گۆشت
نەوت:نەوت
ناکۆکی:ناکۆکی
پیاز:پیاز
ژێرزەمین:ژێرزەمین
ماوە:ماوە
مێرد:مێرد
ژن:ژن
کوڕ:کوڕ
ئاسانکاری:ئاسانکاری
باوک:باوک
ھەرێم:ھەرێم
کەموکورتی:کەموکورتی
هۆ:هۆ
هۆکار:هۆکار
بەڵگە:بەڵگە
پلە:پلە
فێڵ:فێڵ
حکومەت:حکومەت
ھندسە:ھندسەس
ناوکیلە:ناوکیلە
دەستبەسەراگرتن:دەستبەسەراگرتن
سنگ:سنگ
خانە:خانە
دورگە:دورگە
دراما:دراما
ناسراو:ناسراو
شێرپەنجە:شێرپەنجە
هەوکرد:هەوکرد
هەناسەدان:هەناسەدان
حەمام:حەمام
ڕەبۆ:ڕەبۆ
مەوعید:مەوعید
کۆم:کۆم
ئامبوڵانس:ئامبوڵانس
ئەڵکۆڵ:ئەڵکۆڵ
ئەنجومەن:ئەنجومەن
خود:خود
بڕیارنامە:بڕیارنامە
دانیشتووان:دانیشتووان
پارێزگا:پارێزگا
سەدە:سەدە
کۆبوونەوە:کۆبوونەوە
ناوچە:ناوچە
بڕیارنامە:بڕیارنامە
نێونەتەوەیی:نێونەتەوەیی
کار:کار
هۆ:هۆ
لایەن:لایەن
شارستان:شارستان
سەردەم:سەردەم
یەکێک:یەکێک
ویلایەت:ویلایەت
کۆچ:کۆچ
زانست:زانست
ناوەند:ناوەند
یاری:یاری
دەوڵەت:دەوڵەت
دانیشتوان:دانیشتوان
جۆر:جۆر
یانە:یانە
دووەم:دووەم
کۆتایی:کۆتایی
عەرەب:عەرەب
پێک:پێک
لایەن:لایەن
هۆز:هۆز
کانوون:کانوون
بوار:بوار
فارس:فارس
تەشرین:تەشرین
کۆمار:کۆمار
باکوور:باکوور
لەدایکبوون:لەدایکبوون
جیهان:جیهان
شەڕ:شەڕ
کار:کار
شێخ:شێخ
پارت:پارت
تر:تر
هیچ:هیچ
گوناح:گوناح
زەوی:زەوی
ڕوو:ڕوو
ئایین:ئایین
شارۆچکە:شارۆچکە
بەناوبوون:بەناوبوون
دەسەڵات:دەسەڵات
ژین:ژین
رۆژژمێر:رۆژژمێر
خاوەن:خاوەن
ئیسلام:ئیسلام
گۆ:گۆ
بەشدار:بەشدار
پەیوەند:پەیوەند
باس:باس
جیهان:جیهان
ئەندام:ئەندام
ماف:ماف
وشە:وشە
سوڵتان:سوڵتان
ئیسلام:ئیسلام
گۆرانی:گۆرانی
هۆ:هۆ
سیستەم:سیستەم
پێویستە:پێویستە
عوسمانی:عوسمانی
موچە:موچە
سەرچاوە:سەرچاوە
ئەنجام:ئەنجام
ک:ک
کۆمپانیا:کۆمپانیا
نووسەر:نووسەر
پایتەخت:پایتەخت
شیعر:شیعر
شێو:شێو
مەلا:مەلا
نووسەر:نووسەر
خول:خول
بۆنە:بۆنە
سەرۆک:سەرۆک
ملیۆن:ملیۆن
بەدەست:بەدەست
ئاست:ئاست
هەندێك:هەندێك
مامۆستا:مامۆستا
کار:کار
شۆڕش:شۆڕش
کۆمەڵ:کۆمەڵ
ناسراو:ناسراو
ڕووبەر:ڕووبەر
پاشا:پاشا
شاعیر:شاعیر
کیلۆمەتر:کیلۆمەتر
جەنگ:جەنگ
سەرچاوە:سەرچاوە
نمونە:نمونە
لەدایکبوون:لەدایکبوون
خوێندن:خوێندن
باشوور:باشوور
سوپا:سوپا
حیزب:حیزب
ئابووری:ئابووری
کۆمەڵ:کۆمەڵ
ناوچە:ناوچە
دەوڵەت:دەوڵەت
گۆڵکار:گۆڵکار
گەل:گەل
لەشکر:لەشکر
پێغەمبەر:پێغەمبەر
بار:بار
ئەنجام:ئەنجام
دیمپلۆمات:دیمپلۆمات
دانپیانان:دانپیانان
بەتڕیک:بەتڕیک
کۆڕۆنەر:کۆڕۆنەر
شێواز:شێواز
سەرباز:سەرباز
شیعر:شیعر
محەمەد:محەمەد
بەغدا:بەغدا
کەرت:کەرت
شێوەزار:شێوەزار
بەرە:بەرە
خوا:خوا
دەریا:دەریا
جیهان:جیهان
زانین:زانین
ھەزار:ھەزار
مەبەست:مەبەست
ئیبن:ئیبن
تورک:تورک
ڕێگە:ڕێگە
ڕێگا:ڕێگا
یانێ:یانێ
نازناو:نازناو
ھەردوو:ھەردوو
ئەمرۆ:ئەمرۆ
شەڕ:شەڕ
ناوچە:ناوچە
ئەندامان:ئەندامان
یەکێتیی:یەکێتیی
زانست:زانست
وایە:وایە
دەوروبەر:دەوروبەر
موسڵمان:موسڵمان
توانا:توانا
دو:دو
زەنجیرە:زەنجیرە
یەکیەتی:یەکیەتی
بریتی:بریتی
تەممووز:تەممووز
دێمکوکرات:دێمکوکرات
پزیشک:پزیشک
بەشێوەیەک:بەشێوەیەک
بەشێوەیەک:بەشێوەیەک
حکوومەت:حکوومەت
قەزا:قەزا
پاشا:پاشا
هەمان:هەمان
مانا:مانا
سوورەت:سوورەت
شێوە:شێوە
کم:کم
سروشت:سروشت
چاپ:چاپ
ئامێر:ئامێر
بڕیار:بڕیار
هونەر:هونەر
بەرز:بەرز
ناوەند:ناوەند
یاریزان:یاریزان
سنوور:سنوور
تێدابوون:تێدابوون
رۆژاوا:رۆژاوا
ئاماژە:ئاماژە
سەرژمێر:سەرژمێر
گۆڤار:گۆڤار
ڕووبار:ڕووبار
رۆژاوا:رۆژاوا
تیشک:تیشک
دووجا:دووجا
بەرز:بەرز
قۆناغ:قۆناغ
بابەت:بابەت
جیهان:جیهان
باکوور:باکوور
مێژوو:مێژوو
مامۆستا:مامۆستا
هێز:هێز
مزگەوت:مزگەوت
خودا:خودا
ڕیش:ڕیش
کیلۆمەتر:کیلۆمەتر
تۆڕ:تۆڕ
بازرگانی:بازرگانی
ئامارەکان:ئامارەکان
حوکم:حوکم
ئازەربایجان:ئازەربایجان
زیاد:زیاد
حاجی:حاجی
ماڵ:ماڵ
خان:خان
محەمەد:محەمەد
هەڵبژاردن:هەڵبژاردن
سەرکردە:سەرکردە
ئالمانیا:ئالمانیا
مۆر:مۆر
خاك:خاك
وێنە:وێنە
هێز:هێز
ناوبانگ:ناوبانگ
کار:کار
دەسەڵات:دەسەڵات
پاڕێزگا:پاڕێزگا
بەرگە:بەرگە
خوا:خوا
ڕەنگ:ڕەنگ
دایە:دایە
واتا:واتا
ناوچە:ناوچە
پیت:پیت
سەرچاوە:سەرچاوە
جێ:جێ
وێنە:وێنە
ڕۆمان:ڕۆمان
خۆر:خۆر
پێویستبوون:پێویستبوون
شیعر:شیعر
ڕوو:ڕوو
ئەکتەر:ئەکتەر
رۆژ:رۆژ
چالاکی:چالاکی
بۆن:بۆن
تام:تام
مەلە:مەلە
تەماشا:تەماشا
ئەلفوبێ:ئەلفوبێ
ناوبراو:ناوبراو
ئەمڕۆ:ئەمڕۆ
میرنشین:میرنشین
مێژوو:مێژوو
ڕۆژئاوا:ڕۆژئاوا
ئەندام:ئەندام
سەردان:سەردان
ئەکتەر:ئەکتەر
سەید:سەید
ئامار:ئامار
پێشکەش:پێشکەش
ئەڵمانی:ئەڵمانی
فەلسەفە:فەلسەفە
باوەڕ:باوەڕ
ئیبراھیم:ئیبراھیم
میتر:میتر
پێشوازی:پێشوازی
قوتابخانە:قوتابخانە
ویکیپیدیا:ویکیپیدیا
چیرۆک:چیرۆک
ئێستا:ئێستا
شانشین:شانشین
ئامانج:ئامانج
چیا:چیا
فرمان:فرمان
ڕاست:ڕاست
جۆر:جۆر
کیلۆمەتر:کیلۆمەتر
بۆیە:بۆیە
گەندەڵی:گەندەڵی
وەزیر:وەزیر
لەش:لەش
خەریکبوون:خەریکبوون
بچووک:بچووک
مۆسیقا:مۆسیقا
گەل:گەل
کەناڵ:کەناڵ
قورئان:قورئان
ئاسان:ئاسان
سەرچاوە:سەرچاوە
پارێزگا:پارێزگا
مێژوو:مێژوو
سوور:سوور
ئاسمان:ئاسمان
زۆرینە:زۆرینە
رژێم:رژێم
ناوچە:ناوچە
ماڵپەڕ:ماڵپەڕ
هێز:هێز
هێز:هێز
زانا:زانا
گرتە:گرتە
کەش:کەش
خەلیفە:خەلیفە
پۆستە:پۆستە
پۆستەر:پۆستەر
بنەما:بنەما
جیهان:جیهان
درێژایی:درێژایی
لایەن:لایەن
ڕێ:ڕێ
باکور:باکور
یانە:یانە
قەزا:قەزا
ڕۆژهەڵات:ڕۆژهەڵات
ڕووداو:ڕووداو
نیشتمان:نیشتمان
گروپ:گروپ
فەلسەفە:فەلسەفە
دەزگا:دەزگا
گەڕەک:گەڕەک
مەی:مەی
زنجیرە:زنجیرە
خۆشەویست:خۆشەویست
چەک:چەک
ئێوارە:ئێوارە
ئاوارە:ئاوارە
جێگا:جێگا
جێگە:جێگە
نیشان:نیشان
لیست:لیست
دەرەوە:دەرەوە
پۆل:پۆل
بیردۆز:بیردۆز
هەرێم:هەرێم
نوێنەر:نوێنەر
بوون:بوون
کۆچ:کۆچ
شەو:شەو
مردن:مردن
کۆمار:کۆمار
مەبەست:مەبەست
لەش:لەش
لاو:لاو
ڕێگە:ڕێگە
پاڵەوان:پاڵەوان
ڕۆڵ:ڕۆڵ
چارەسەر:چارەسەر
تیپ:تیپ
گیان:گیان
ڕوو:ڕوو
ڕادیۆ:ڕادیۆ
ماڵ:ماڵ
گەل:گەل
کەوا:کەوا
کار:کار
زاراوە:زاراوە
ژین:ژین
پەرە:پەرە
موسڵمان:موسڵمان
پلە:پلە
کاروبار:کاروبار
مان:مان
توخم:توخم
پەرلەمان:پەرلەمان
پارێزگا:پارێزگا
باشوور:باشوور
لێکۆڵین:لێکۆڵین
سکرتێر:سکرتێر
م:م
عومەر:عومەر
تاک:تاک
سەد:سەد
با:با
کۆمەڵ:کۆمەڵ
جۆر:جۆر
وزە:وزە
میر:میر
تێکەڵ:تێکەڵ
یاری:یاری
لاتین:لاتین
ژ:ژ
چەمک:چەمک
ئەدەب:ئەدەب
وەرزش:وەرزش
وەرزشگا:وەرزشگا
نیشتەجێ:نیشتەجێ
گۆڕان:گۆڕان
بڕوانامە:بڕوانامە
پاییز:پاییز
ڕزگاربوو:ڕزگاربوو
گەشە:گەشە
شانۆ:شانۆ
سیاسەت:سیاسەت
خزمەت:خزمەت
ئایین:ئایین
پێغەمبەر:پێغەمبەر
بەگ:بەگ
کۆنگرە:کۆنگرە
دیوان:دیوان
پێکهاتە:پێکهاتە
ووڵات:ووڵات
بەرد:بەرد
قەڵا:قەڵا
کون:کون
سیستەم:سیستەم
بەرنامە:بەرنامە
هاوکات:هاوکات
دامەزرێنەر:دامەزرێنەر
هاوکار:هاوکار
هەتاو:هەتاو
ئەکتەر:ئەکتەر
ویکی:ویکی
شوێن:شوێن
گۆران:گۆران
فڕۆکە:فڕۆکە
شۆڕش:شۆڕش
کات:کات
زێویە:زێویە
شەڕ:شەڕ
پارێزگار:پارێزگار
پایتەخت:پایتەخت
کێو:کێو
دیوان:دیوان
بەڵێن:بەڵێن
ڕۆشنبیر:ڕۆشنبیر
سەرکردە:سەرکردە
دیاری:دیاری
ئێس:ئێس
ئێسک:ئێسک
سەردەم:سەردەم
دیموکراسی:دیموکراسی
چۆنیەتی:چۆنیەتی
ئەندازیار:ئەندازیار
نیشتیمان:نیشتیمان
گۆرانیبێژ:گۆرانیبێژ
کەڵک:کەڵک
ڕۆژئاوا:ڕۆژئاوا
گروپ:گروپ
ھەست:ھەست
ڕاستەوخۆ:ڕاستەوخۆ
کۆئەندام:کۆئەندام
پێست:پێست
نمونە:نمونە
سەدە:سەدە
ئێش:ئێش
سێیەم:سێیەم
مێتاڵ:مێتاڵ
سوود:سوود
سەردەم:سەردەم
پەیمان:پەیمان
پەروەردە:پەروەردە
پەروەردگار:پەروەردگار
ئیمام:ئیمام
قوتابخانە:قوتابخانە
بۆچوون:بۆچوون
یاریگا:یاریگا
نیشتمان:نیشتمان
سوپا:سوپا
میلیۆن:میلیۆن
سروشت:سروشت
پێناسە:پێناسە
ڕێباز:ڕێباز
یارییەک:یارییەک
ئیمپراتۆر:ئیمپراتۆر
ئیش:ئیش
کردار:کردار
عوسمانیەکان:عوسمانیەکان
زیندانی:زیندانی
چەک:چەک
دەشت:دەشت
پەکەکە:پەکەکە
ھونەر:ھونەر
مام:مام
ھێما:ھێما
کەنداو:کەنداو
ڕامیاری:ڕامیاری
نوێژ:نوێژ
مێشک:مێشک
ڕێگا:ڕێگا
شیواز:شیواز
سوڵتان:سوڵتان
سەرکەوتن:سەرکەوتن
زەویی:زەویی
پشتی:پشتی
یاری:یاری
چاپ:چاپ
پەل:پەل
سازمان:سازمان
دانیشتوان:دانیشتوان
بڕیار:بڕیار
زانین:زانین
دانراو:دانراو
ئیمام:ئیمام
نیشان:نیشان
هاوسەرگیری:هاوسەرگیری
شت:شت
ویندۆز:ویندۆز
نموونە:نموونە
کۆمەڵ:کۆمەڵ
کشتوکاڵ:کشتوکاڵ
شیعە:شیعە
خاک:خاک
ئەستۆ:ئەستۆ
شەپۆل:شەپۆل
تورک:تورک
یاریزان:یاریزان
ڕەنگ:ڕەنگ
ژێ:ژێ
جوگرافیا:جوگرافیا
مەزهەب:مەزهەب
مایکڵ:مایکڵ
سوود:سوود
دانیشتوو:دانیشتوو
ئامێر:ئامێر
میرزا:میرزا
کۆتایی:کۆتایی
چیرۆک:چیرۆک
یاد:یاد
وزە:وزە
رۆماننووس:رۆماننووس
سم:سم
دۆلار:دۆلار
خەبات:خەبات
پزیشک:پزیشک
وتار:وتار
هونەر:هونەر
کارگێڕ:کارگێڕ
کار:کار
شەڕ:شەڕ
خودا:خودا
ئۆسکار:ئۆسکار
مەتر:مەتر
خولەک:خولەک
مەبەست:مەبەست
هاوڕێ:هاوڕێ
ئەنجوومەن:ئەنجوومەن
عەرەبی:عەرەبی
عەبباسی:عەبباسی
ئەلبووم:ئەلبووم
مرۆڤایەتی:مرۆڤایەتی
سیستەم:سیستەم
سیاسەت:سیاسەت
ڕێگە:ڕێگە
بەعس:بەعس
کەڵک:کەڵک
ڕژێم:ڕژێم
ژین:ژین
کورمانج:کورمانج
کرێکار:کرێکار
دەریا:دەریا
ئەمین:ئەمین
جەماوەر:جەماوەر
بەشدار:بەشدار
درەخت:درەخت
پشوو:پشوو
باکور:باکور
ھەڵگر:ھەڵگر
چیرۆک:چیرۆک
توانین:توانین
تیۆری:تیۆری
ئەپڵ:ئەپڵ
ماددە:ماددە
کۆشک:کۆشک
کاربۆن:کاربۆن
خاچپەرست:خاچپەرست
پێشمەرگە:پێشمەرگە
ئەندازیار:ئەندازیار
وێژە:وێژە
ڕوانگە:ڕوانگە
هێما:هێما
ڕێگا:ڕێگا
سێیەم:سێیەم
دەرهێنەر:دەرهێنەر
دارایی:دارایی
پاپا:پاپا
باوەڕ:باوەڕ
ئیسلام:ئیسلام
ئاکام:ئاکام
چۆم:چۆم
گوێ:گوێ
کۆمپانیا:کۆمپانیا
کۆتایی:کۆتایی
سێکولاریزم:سێکولاریزم
ڕێگا:ڕێگا
بازاڕ:بازاڕ
ئاسمان:ئاسمان
ڕەوت:ڕەوت
نەوت:نەوت
دیمەن:دیمەن
دەستوور:دەستوور
حزب:حزب
بەروار:بەروار
بەرژەوەندی:بەرژەوەندی
مەلیک:مەلیک
لەسەرەتای:لەسەرەتای
دژایەتی:دژایەتی
بەرد:بەرد
ڕابردوو:ڕابردوو
والی:والی
مەیدان:مەیدان
فیزیک:فیزیک
ئێکس:ئێکس
ئاست:ئاست
ئاڵا:ئاڵا
قەبارە:قەبارە
زانین:زانین
پەرلەمان:پەرلەمان
لەدایكبوون:لەدایكبوون
دەبێت:دەبێت
جەماوەر:جەماوەر
پەیکەر:پەیکەر
پاڵەوان:پاڵەوان
ئینگلیز:ئینگلیز
ئاسن:ئاسن
هێما:هێما
ناسراو:ناسراو
میللی:میللی
مایکرۆسۆفت:مایکرۆسۆفت
گۆرانیبێژ:گۆرانیبێژ
دیاردە:دیاردە
چوارچێوە:چوارچێوە
چاک:چاک
تەلەفیزۆن:تەلەفیزۆن
پەیمانگا:پەیمانگا
بوار:بوار
باو:باو
ماف:ماف
کۆتایی:کۆتایی
زنجیرە:زنجیرە
ویستن:ویستن
پەیمانبەست:پەیمانبەست
بیستەم:بیستەم
یاریکەر:یاریکەر
یاریدەر:یاریدەر
وشە:وشە
بینەر:بینەر
نەخشە:نەخشە
هێز:هێز
لاو:لاو
زێڕ:زێڕ
فڕۆکەخانە:فڕۆکەخانە
شەڕ:شەڕ
شکست:شکست
سەرچاوە:سەرچاوە
سەدە:سەدە
دەستەڵات:دەستەڵات
هاوڕێ:هاوڕێ
یەکبوون:یەکبوون
شاعیر:شاعیر
سووپەر:سووپەر
سزا:سزا
سەرنج:سەرنج
ڕێژە:ڕێژە
چیا:چیا
بزوتنەوە:بزوتنەوە
ئەندام:ئەندام
ئامادەبوون:ئامادەبوون
وانە:وانە
نیمچە:نیمچە
مێژوو:مێژوو
لق:لق
گروپ:گروپ
یەکگرتوو:یەکگرتوو
سەرەکی:سەرەکی
کافەیین:کافەیین
ڕۆژهەڵات:ڕۆژهەڵات
خەلافەت:خەلافەت
بڵاوکردنەوە:بڵاوکردنەوە
ئەرستۆ:ئەرستۆ
ماف:ماف
سیتی:سیتی
هەژار:هەژار
زیندوو:زیندوو
جۆر:جۆر
هاوبەش:هاوبەش
هەتاو:هەتاو
هۆنراوە:هۆنراوە
مۆزەخانە:مۆزەخانە
سکووڵ:سکووڵ
سەردەم:سەردەم
هەرێم:هەرێم
زیادە:زیادە
دیاریکردن:دیاریکردن
پەیوەندی:پەیوەندی
ئەشکەوت:ئەشکەوت
هێز:هێز
مایە:مایە
کەشتی:کەشتی
فیفا:فیفا
شەهید:شەهید
سووڕ:سووڕ
دیکە:دیکە
جێبەجێکردن:جێبەجێکردن
تەرخان:تەرخان
واتا:واتا
بناغە:بناغە
ئاوایی:ئاوایی
هونەرمەند:هونەرمەند
سەرکردە:سەرکردە
زانا:زانا
دەرکەوتوو:دەرکەوتوو
خۆر:خۆر
حاکم:حاکم
تەن:تەن
تێسلا:تێسلا
پێشەوا:پێشەوا
بوونیان:بوونیان
یانە:یانە
یاریی:یاریی
ویلایەت:ویلایەت
نوێنەر:نوێنەر
نیشانە:نیشانە
ناز:ناز
لەیەكچوون:لەیەكچوون
گەل:گەل
چۆن:چۆن
قەڵەم:قەڵەم
فەرموودە:فەرموودە
سەهەڵدان:سەهەڵدان
دەستنیشان:دەستنیشان
خۆ:خۆ
جیهان:جیهان
جەستە:جەستە
جۆراوجۆر:جۆراوجۆر
لەجیاتی:لەجیاتی
تیۆر:تیۆر
بەهانە:بەهانە
ئەندازە:ئەندازە
وەفات:وەفات
مانەوە:مانەوە
مامناوەندی:مامناوەندی
کۆمەڵ:کۆمەڵ
زانین:زانین
هەزار:هەزار
گوتن:گوتن
خستنەسەر:خستنەسەر
پرۆژە:پرۆژە
بڕوا:بڕوا
ئارەزوو:ئارەزوو
ون:ون
ناوخۆ:ناوخۆ
فلیم:فلیم
هەڵکەوتوو:هەڵکەوتوو
کۆمۆنیست:کۆمۆنیست
کۆمپانیا:کۆمپانیا
یەکسان:یەکسان
یەکجار:یەکجار
شازدەهەم:شازدەهەم
شاهانە:شاهانە
سوار:سوار
سادە:سادە
داگیرکردن:داگیرکردن
حەج:حەج
تەکنیک:تەکنیک
تیرۆر:تیرۆر
بنەما:بنەما
ڕووبەڕوو:ڕووبەڕوو
وێران:وێران
وێب:وێب
ڕۆماننوس:ڕۆماننوس
سەیر:سەیر
ڕۆژنامەوان:ڕۆژنامەوان
دەرکردن:دەرکردن
دەرەکی:دەرەکی
ڕۆژئاوا:ڕۆژئاوا
دەبنەوە:دەبنەوە
توێژینەوە:توێژینەوە
تێكەڵ:تێكەڵ
تاقە:تاقە
پلان:پلان
پیرەمێرد:پیرەمێرد
پەرەسەندن:پەرەسەندن
ڕێبەر:ڕێبەر
بابە:بابە
ئۆسکار:ئۆسکار
وەها:وەها
نەورۆز:نەورۆز
ناوەند:ناوەند
ناوچە:ناوچە
لێژنە:لێژنە
فەیلەسوف:فەیلەسوف
فەرمی:فەرمی
شیاو:شیاو
زارۆك:زارۆك
بیرۆکە:بیرۆکە
ئۆقیانوس:ئۆقیانوس
هەرچەندە:هەرچەندە
ناونیشان:ناونیشان
گۆڕستان:گۆڕستان
کەناڵ:کەناڵ
کۆمپانیا:کۆمپانیا
قوربانی:قوربانی
نەخۆشی:نەخۆشی
خانوو:خانوو
ئاگاداری:ئاگاداری
تەلەفۆن:تەلەفۆن
کۆڕ:کۆڕ
دەستە:دەستە
وڵات:وڵات
ئینگلیزی:ئینگلیزی
ئاتەر:ئاتەر
ئارد:ئارد
ئازادی:ئازادی
ئازار:ئازار
ئاشتی:ئاشتی
ئافرەت:ئافرەت
ئاو:ئاو
ئاپارتمان:ئاپارتمان
